Colorado statutes. TITLE 43 Transportation
PART 5
JUNKYARDS ADJACENT TO HIGHWAYS

43-1-501. Legislative declaration.

It is declared to be the purpose of the general assembly in the passage of this part 5 that in connection with the construction, maintenance, and supervision of the public highways of this state, the state of Colorado place itself in a position to receive its full share of funds to be apportioned by the congress of the United States for expenditures on federal-aid highways in this state and, to this end, to control the existing and future use and maintenance of junkyards in areas adjacent to the interstate and primary highway systems in order to protect the public investment in such highways; to promote the safety and recreational value of public travel; to promote public pride and public spirit, both on a statewide and local basis; to attract to this state tourists and other travelers with a view toward broadening the economic well-being and general welfare; and to preserve and enhance the natural and scenic beauty of this state.

Source:

L. 66:

p. 9, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-16-1.

43-1-502. Definitions.

As used in this part 5, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Automobile graveyard" means any establishment or place of business which is maintained, used, or operated for storing, keeping, buying, or selling wrecked, scrapped, ruined, or dismantled motor vehicles or motor vehicle parts.

"Department" means the department of transportation.

"Highway" means the federal-aid primary and interstate systems, as defined in section 43-2-101.

"Junk" means old or scrap copper, brass, rope, rags, batteries, paper, trash, rubber debris, waste, or junked, dismantled, or wrecked automobiles, appliances, or parts thereof, iron, steel, and other old or scrap ferrous or nonferrous material.

"Junkyard" means an establishment or place of business which is maintained, operated, or used for storing, keeping, buying, or selling junk or for the maintenance or operation of an automobile graveyard, and the term includes garbage dumps and sanitary fills.

"Person" means any individual, firm, agency, company, association, partnership, business trust, joint stock company, or corporation who operates a junkyard or who allows a junkyard to be placed or to remain on premises controlled by him.

Source:

L. 66:

p. 9, § 2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-16-2.

L. 91:

(2) amended, p. 1096, § 118, effective July 1.

43-1-503. Permits required - exceptions.

Except as provided in this part 5, on and after February 11, 1966, no person shall establish, operate, and maintain a junkyard which is within one thousand feet of the nearest edge of the right-of-way of the highway and visible from the main-traveled way thereof unless a permit is first obtained from the department. No permit shall be required and junkyards, automobile graveyards, and scrap metal processing facilities may be operated within areas adjacent to said highways which are within one thousand feet of the nearest edge of the right-of-way which are zoned industrial under authority of state law, or any of its political subdivisions.

Source:

L. 66:

p. 10, § 3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-16-3.

43-1-504. Permits issued - when.

The department has the sole authority to issue permits for the establishment, maintenance, and operation of junkyards within the limits prescribed by this part 5. No permit shall be issued unless such junkyard can be effectively screened, as required by regulation, by natural objects, plantings, fences, or other appropriate means so as not to be visible from the main-traveled way of such highways. Such screening shall be at the expense of the person applying for said permit.

Source:

L. 66:

p. 10, § 4.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-16-4.

43-1-505. Permit fees - expiration - renewal.

Each application or request for a permit shall be accompanied by a fee of twenty-five dollars to defray the costs of administration of this part 5 by the department. All permits issued under this section shall expire one year from the date of issue and shall be renewed upon compliance with the provisions of this part 5 from year to year upon payment to the department of said annual fee. Such fees shall be collected, in accordance with the collection rules of the department of revenue, for deposit in the state treasury to the credit of the general revenue fund. The general assembly shall make annual appropriations from the general revenue fund for the administration of this part 5.

Source:

L. 66:

p. 10, § 5.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-16-5.

43-1-506. Regulations.

The department may promulgate such regulations as may be necessary concerning the issuance of such permits in order to qualify the state of Colorado for payments made available by congress to those states that meet federal standards for control of junkyards adjacent to its highways. The provisions of article 4 of title 24, C.R.S., shall not be applicable, except that section 24-4-106, C.R.S., shall apply.

Source:

L. 66:

p. 11, § 6.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-16-6.

43-1-507. Judicial review.

Any person aggrieved by action of the department in denying or revoking a permit may, within thirty days of the date of notice thereof, apply to a court of competent jurisdiction for appropriate relief pursuant to the Colorado rules of civil procedure or section 24-4-106, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 66:

p. 11, § 7.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-16-7.

43-1-508. Violations - penalties.

Any person who violates any of the provisions of this part 5 is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine of not less than twenty-five dollars nor more than one hundred dollars. Each day of violation of the provisions of this part 5 shall constitute a separate offense. In addition, and not in lieu of or as a bar to criminal enforcement as provided in this section, the department is authorized to institute appropriate action or proceedings to prevent or remove any junkyard existing in violation of the provisions of this part 5.

Source:

L. 66:

p. 11, § 8.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-16-8.

43-1-509. Screening - removal of existing junkyards.

Any junkyard in existence on February 11, 1966, which is not in compliance with this part 5 shall, at the expense of the department, be screened, as provided by regulations, by natural objects, plantings, fences, or other appropriate means so as not to be visible from the main-traveled way of the highway or, at the expense of the department, shall be removed from sight. The department is authorized to acquire, move, or relocate property, real or personal, or interests therein, by purchase, donation, condemnation, or by exchange of other property owned by the state to accomplish such objectives and to dispose of any property, real or personal, acquired thereby.

Source:

L. 66:

p. 11, § 9.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-16-9.

Cross references:

For condemnation proceedings, see articles 1 to 7 of title 38.